Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1112
Risk analysis, defined.

Risk analysis means a comprehensive evaluation of a person's potential for future dangerous behavior towards others, including recommendations to minimize the likelihood of harm to others in the least restrictive alternative.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 12.